Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1528
Use of funds.

The Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program may use the funds appropriated to the program for the following purposes:

(1) The purposes established in sections 68-1522 and 68-1523;

(2) Costs related to developing provider recruitment and training, information and referral, outreach, and other components of the provision of respite services;

(3) One-time-only startup costs related to the establishment of the community lifespan respite services program; and

(4) Minimum administrative costs for operating the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program.

Laws 1999, LB 148, § 9.